Washington statutes.
RCW 7.43.050

Priority of actions.

An action under this chapter shall have precedence over all other actions, except prior matters of the same character, criminal proceedings, election contests, hearings on temporary restraining orders and injunctions, and actions to forfeit vehicles used in violation of the uniform controlled substances act.

[ 1988 c 141 s 8.]